Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.301, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Unlicensed manufacture. (a) Nothing in this chapter requires a license for the natural fermentation of fruit juices or brewing of beernew text begin , or distillation of spiritsnew text end in the home for family use. (b) Naturally fermented fruit juices or beer new text begin or distilled spirits new text end made under this subdivision may be removed from the premises where made for use at organized affairs, exhibitions, or competitions, including, but not limited to, homemaker's contests, tastings, or judging. (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "tastings" means an event where the general public may sample unlicensed naturally fermented fruit juices or beernew text begin or distilled spiritsnew text end . (d) Beverages produced pursuant to this subdivision may be sampled or used in tastings provided that the beverage is made and transported in containers and equipment that shall not allow the migration of toxic substances. (e) Public notice meeting the requirements of this paragraph must be given in writing or signage at any tasting. The notice shall include disclosure that the unlicensed naturally fermented fruit juices or beer new text begin or distilled spirits new text end being offered is homemade and not subject to state inspection, and may be consumed by persons over the age of 21 at their own risk. The notice must include the name and address of the person who processed and bottled the beverage. (f) Naturally fermented fruit juices or beer new text begin or distilled spirits new text end removed under this subdivision may not be sold or offered for sale. new text begin (g) No person may produce more than 100 gallons of distilled spirits per year under this subdivision. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.705, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-00122 340A.705 PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE. The finding of an unauthorized still is prima facie evidence of possession for the purpose of unlawful manufacture of alcoholic beverages.